Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6294.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 282. (1) For tax years that begin on and after January 1, 2027 through December 31, 2031, a taxpayer who serves as a preceptor for a qualified clinical rotation at a health care site that is approved by the institution of higher education and is located in this state may claim a credit against the tax imposed by this part in an amount equal to $1,000.00 for every 250 hours completed during the tax year as a preceptor for qualified clinical rotation, not to exceed $3,000.00 per tax year. To claim the credit under this section, the taxpayer shall submit a certified written statement that the taxpayer did not receive payment during the tax year from any source for serving as a preceptor and supporting documentation in a form and manner as prescribed by the department to verify the taxpayer's hours of participation as a preceptor with the annual tax return filed under this part on which a credit under this section is claimed. (2) If the amount of the credit allowed under this section exceeds the tax liability of the taxpayer for the tax year, that portion of the credit that exceeds the tax liability of the taxpayer for the tax year must be refunded. (3) As used in this section: (a) "Health care professional" means an individual who is licensed, certified, registered, or otherwise authorized to practice a health profession under article 15 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.16101 to 333.18838. (b) "Health profession" means a vocation, calling, occupation, or employment performed by a health care professional. (c) "Institution of higher education" means an institution of higher education described in section 4, 5, or 6 of article VIII of the state constitution of 1963 or an independent nonprofit degree-granting institution of postsecondary education located in this state that is approved by the state board of education. (d) "Preceptor" means a health care professional who provides supervision and instruction during student clinical rotation training experiences and is otherwise not compensated for the time or services provided. (e) "Qualified clinical rotation" means a clinical rotation required by an institution of higher education that is established for a student who is enrolled in an accredited health profession program and requires the student to complete a minimum number of hours of instruction in a clinical setting under the guidance of a health care professional at a health care site approved by the institution of higher education.